Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPORT; CULTURAL RESOURCES EXPENDITURES.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "cultural resources expenditure" means an expenditure resulting from a specific project for trunk highway construction or reconstruction that is related to historic preservation, archaeological resources, or other cultural resources; and new text end new text begin (2) "reporting period" means fiscal years 2020 to 2027. new text end new text begin (b) By January 31, 2026, the commissioner of transportation must submit a report on cultural resources expenditures to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. At a minimum, the report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an overview of cultural resources expenditures; new text end new text begin (2) the total cultural resources expenditure amount or estimate for each fiscal year in the reporting period; new text end new text begin (3) a comparison of total budgeted versus actual cultural resources expenditures for each closed fiscal year in the reporting period; and new text end new text begin (4) total cultural resources expenditures in each major highway project, as specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.56, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), having an applicable expenditure, with: new text end new text begin (i) a summary description of the costs involved; and new text end new text begin (ii) a breakout by type of resource, including historic properties, archeological resources, burial grounds, and human remains. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURAL RESOURCES EXPENDITURES REPORT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for the cultural resources expenditures report under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end